Georgia, session 2025_26, HB762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Short title.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Savannah Music Commission Act."
SECTION 2.
Findings.
It is found and determined that:
H. B. 762
- 1 -

LC 44 3090/AP
(1) The music and recording industry is a complex ecosystem comprising various
components that work together to create, promote, distribute, and consume music;
(2) The Savannah area is poised to become a destination hub for the music industry;
(3) Artists, producers, labels, marketers, and many others all play critical roles in
bringing music to life and ensuring it reaches audiences globally. Understanding these
components is essential for a successful blueprint for the Savannah area's music industry;
and
(4) It will be the mandate of the Savannah Music Commission to promote the music
industry in the Savannah area.
SECTION 3.
Definitions.
As used in this Act, the following words and terms shall have the meaning specified unless
the context or use clearly indicates a different meaning or intent:
(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the Savannah Music Commission.
(2) "Commission" means the Savannah Music Commission.
SECTION 4.
Savannah Music Commission created.
There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the "Savannah Music
Commission" which shall be deemed to be a public corporation. Such corporation shall be
separate and distinct from any public corporation or other entity heretofore created by the
General Assembly and shall be an instrumentality of the State of Georgia exercising
governmental and proprietary powers. The commission is created for the purpose of
promoting the Savannah area as a music destination; recruiting and organizing music
H. B. 762
- 2 -

LC 44 3090/AP
festivals and concerts; partnering with local businesses, schools, and organizations to create
diverse music programs; working with local government and businesses to secure funding
and sponsorships for music initiatives; advocating for music education and resources in local
schools; and otherwise promoting the music industry in the Savannah area. In connection
with the exercise of any of its powers, the members of the commission may make findings
or determinations that the exercise of its powers will support the purposes for which the
commission is created.
SECTION 5.
Board of directors.
(a) The commission shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of nine members
appointed by the members of the Georgia General Assembly House of Representatives and
the members of the Georgia General Assembly Senate who represent any portion of
Chatham County.
(b) The board of directors shall consist of:
(1) Three members who shall be music producers, recording artists, or managers;
(2) Two members who shall be local music venue owners or business leaders in music
related industries;
(3) Two members who shall be representatives from local arts organizations or cultural
affairs departments; and
(4) Two members who shall be city commission members or tourism officials.
(c) Appointed members of the commission shall serve three-year terms. Members
appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term. No member
appointed to the commission shall serve more than two consecutive complete terms. A
member becomes eligible to serve again one year after his or her second consecutive
complete term ended.
H. B. 762
- 3 -

LC 44 3090/AP
(d) The board shall establish bylaws that elect officers, set election dates, outline
nomination processes, and sets forth the rules and regulations of the commission. Once
approved by the board, the bylaws shall be voted on by the general membership of the
commission.
(e) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.
SECTION 6.
Powers and duties.
The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;
(2) To contract for services necessary to carry out its mission;
(3) To adopt and alter its own bylaws;
(4) To receive and utilize gifts, donations, and contributions of money and property and
services as necessary to carry out its mission;
(5) To exercise the powers conferred upon a "public corporation" by Article IX, Section
III, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, such corporation being expressly declared
to be a public corporation within the meaning of such provision of the Constitution of
Georgia;
(6) To appoint, select, and employ, with or without bidding as the commission may
choose, officers, agents, and employees;
(7) To acquire, construct, purchase, hold, own, lease as lessee, expand, improve,
renovate, repair, maintain, and operate real and personal property or interests therein;
(8) To sell, lease as lessor, or otherwise transfer, pledge, or dispose of any real and
personal property interests therein. In connection with any such sale, lease, transfer
assignment, or other disposition, the commission need not comply with any other
H. B. 762
- 4 -

LC 44 3090/AP
provision of law requiring public bidding or notice to the public of such sale, lease,
transfer, assignment, or other disposition;
(9) To acquire projects and other property in its own name by gift or by purchase on such
terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper. If the commission shall
deem it expedient to construct any project on real property or any interest therein or
usufruct therein which is subject to the control of any other public body, then such other
public body is hereby authorized to convey or lease such real property or interest therein
to the commission for no consideration or for such consideration as may be agreed upon
by the commission and such other public body, taking into consideration the public
benefit to be derived from such conveyance, lease, or usufruct. Any public body may
transfer such real property or interest therein without regard to any determination as to
whether or not such property or interest therein is surplus;
(10) To make and execute with one or more public bodies and private persons contracts,
lease agreements, rental agreements, installment sale agreements, and other instruments
100 relating to the property of the commission and incident to the exercise of the powers of
101 the commission, including contracts for constructing, leasing, renting, and selling its
102 projects for the benefit of other public bodies and, without limiting the generality of the
103 foregoing, authority is specifically granted to the commission and to other public bodies
104 to enter into contracts, lease agreements, rental agreements, installment sale agreements,
105 and related agreements with each other relating to the provision of any project or services
106 for a term not exceeding 50 years, as provided in Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I(a)
107 of the Constitution of Georgia;
108 (11) To be a co-owner, along with other public bodies, or to the extent allowed by the
109 Constitution of Georgia, private persons of any property, if the commission finds and
110 determines that such co-ownership is in the best interests of the commission and will
111 serve the public purposes of the commission;
H. B. 762
- 5 -

LC 44 3090/AP
112 (12) To purchase policies of insurance as may be deemed appropriate for its corporate
113 purposes;
114 (13) To operate, lease, sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of any property, real or
115 personal, or assets of the commission, or to assign its rights under its contracts, lease
116 agreements, or installment sale agreements or its right to receive payments thereunder,
117 either directly or through trust or custodial arrangements whereby interests are created
118 in such contracts, lease agreements, or installment sale agreements or the payments to be
119 received thereunder through the issuance of trust certificates, certificates of participation,
120 custodial receipts, or other similar instruments. In connection with any such lease, sale,
121 transfer, assignment, or other disposition, the commission need not comply with any
122 other provision of law requiring public bidding or any notice to the public of such lease,
123 sale, transfer, assignment, or other disposition;
124 (14) To accept loans and grants of money or property of any kind from the United States
125 or any public body or private person, and all public bodies are authorized to make grants
126 to the commission, subject to any limitations in the Constitution of Georgia;
127 (15) To make such rules and regulations governing its employees and property as it may
128 in its discretion deem proper;
129 (16) To be sued the same as any private corporation on any contractual obligation of the
130 commission. The commission shall have the same rights to sue any other person or entity
131 as any private corporation; and
132 (17) To have and exercise the usual powers of private corporations, except such as are
133 inconsistent with this Act, and to do any and all things necessary and convenient to
134 accomplish the purposes and powers of the commission as stated in this Act.
H. B. 762
- 6 -

LC 44 3090/AP
135 SECTION 7.
136 The board as trustees.
137 The board shall be held accountable in all respects as trustees. The commission or its fiscal
138 agent shall keep suitable records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind.
139 There shall be an independent audit of the commission if the commission received or spent
140 money in a taxable year without the use of a fiscal agent.
141 SECTION 8.
142 Charitable and public functions.
143 The creation of the commission and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all
144 respects for the benefit of the people of the state. The commission is an institution of purely
145 public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of
146 the power conferred upon it by this Act. The commission shall not be required to pay any
147 taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it or under its
148 jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or any
149 rates, fees, tolls, or other charges for the use of such projects or other income received by the
150 commission.
151 SECTION 9.
152 Actions.
153 Any action brought against the commission shall be brought in the Superior Court of
154 Chatham County and such court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such question.
H. B. 762
- 7 -

LC 44 3090/AP
155 SECTION 10.
156 Liberal construction.
157 Being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, this Act shall be liberally construed to
158 effect the purposes of the Act.
159 SECTION 11.
160 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 762
- 8 -